Missouri, session 2026, HB1794.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 92.835 and 140.420, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 92.835 and 140.420, to read as follows:
92.835. 1. The title to any real estate which shall vest in the land reutilization
authority under the provisions of sections 92.700 to 92.920 shall be held by the land
reutilization authority of the city in trust for the tax bill owners and taxing authorities having
an interest in any tax liens which were foreclosed, as their interests may appear in the
judgment of foreclosure.
2. The title to any real estate which shall vest in any purchaser, upon confirmation of
such sale by the court, shall be an absolute estate in fee simple, subject to rights-of-way
thereon of public utilities on which tax has been otherwise paid, and subject to any tax lien
thereon of the United States of America, if any, and all persons other than a political
subdivision created under Article VI, Section 30(a) of the Constitution of Missouri,
including the state of Missouri, any taxing authority or tax district as defined herein, judgment
creditors, lienholders, minors, incapacitated and disabled persons, and nonresidents who may
have had any right, title, interest, claim, or equity of redemption in or to, or lien upon, such
lands shall be barred and forever foreclosed of all such right, title, interest, claim, lien or
equity of redemption, and the court shall order immediate possession of such real estate be
given to such purchaser. If such parcel of real estate is sold to the land reutilization authority
the title thereto shall be free of any liens to the extent of the interest of any taxing authority in
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1794 2
such real estate; provided further, that such title shall not be subject to the lien of special tax
bills.
140.420. If no person shall redeem the lands sold for taxes prior to the expiration of
the right to redeem, at the expiration thereof, and on production of the certificate of purchase
and upon proof satisfactory to the collector that a purchaser or the purchaser's heirs,
successors, or assigns are authorized to acquire the deed:
(1) The collector of the county in which the sale of such lands took place shall
execute to the purchaser or the purchaser's heirs or assigns, in the name of the state, a
conveyance of the real estate so sold, which shall vest in the grantee an absolute estate in fee
simple, subject, however, to all claims thereon for unpaid taxes except such unpaid taxes
existing at time of the purchase of said lands and the lien for which taxes was inferior to the
lien for taxes for which said tract or lot of land was sold; and
(2) The state of Missouri or any person, taxing authority, tax district, judgment
creditor, or lienholder other than a political subdivision created under Article VI, Section
30(a) of the Constitution of Missouri that had a right, title, interest, claim, or equity of
redemption on or to the lands or that had a lien upon the lands shall be barred and forever
foreclosed of such unclaimed right, title, interest, claim, or equity of redemption in or to the
lands and of any lien upon the lands.
✔